California, session 20252026, AB1456.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21088.1 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21088.1. (a) For purposes of this section, “FPEIR” means the Final Program Environmental Impact Report. Report for the California Vegetation Treatment Program, certified by the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection on December 30, 2019.(b) On or before January 1, 2027, the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection shall update the California Vegetation Treatment Program FPEIR, certified by the state board in December 2019, FPEIR in accordance with Section 21166. The update shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:(1) Expand the area that is treatable landscape under the FPEIR to portions of the state suitable for vegetation treatment consistent with the FPEIR, including for the treatment types of ecological restoration, fuel breaks, and wildland-urban interface fuel reduction, regardless of fire suppression responsibility designation.(2) Require a project under the FPEIR to incorporate in its project description the disposition of biomass generated by vegetation treatments, as necessary, including any commercial sale of biomass for the purpose of cost recovery.(3) Include provisions that recognize the dual objectives of cultural and ecological restoration through vegetation management activities that integrate indigenous knowledge and tribal ecological knowledge, and recognize cultural burning conducted pursuant to Section 4505 as a covered treatment activity.(4) Undertake any amendments necessary to implement the objectives stated in the Governor’s Proclamation of a State of Emergency, dated March 1, 2025.(c) The FPEIR shall remain in full effect and may continue to serve as the basis for later project-specific environmental analyses to support vegetation treatment projects while the update pursuant to subdivision (b) is being prepared.(c)(d) A public agency may partner with a federally recognized California Native American tribe to conduct a project under the FPEIR in the agency’s jurisdiction.